Idaho, session 2025, H0033.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 60, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 60-106B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
60-106B. ELECTRONIC PUBLICATION. (1) Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, any person, governmental entity, or business or other
entity required or permitted under the laws of the state of Idaho to pub-
lish notices, publications, or other information in a newspaper may instead
electronically publish such notices, publications, or other information
on the state controller's website. If all requirements of this section are
met, notices, publications, or other information electronically published
pursuant to this section shall have the same legal effect as notices, publi-
cations, or other information published in a newspaper pursuant to section
60-106, Idaho Code.
(2) The minimum publishing dates and duration requirements under the
laws of the state of Idaho for publishing notices, publications, or other in-
formation in a print newspaper shall apply equally to notices, publications,
or other information electronically published pursuant to this section.
(3) A governmental entity that electronically publishes any notice,
publication, or other information pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Comply with all advance notice requirements regarding the number of
days of advance notice required prior to government action; and
(b) Comply with the agenda requirements provided in section 74-204,
Idaho Code.
(4) The state controller shall facilitate the receipt, storage, and
publication of notices, publications, and other information that are pub-
lished pursuant to this section and ensure that the same are accessible to
the public free of charge. To fulfill the requirements of this section, the
state controller may adopt a staggered implementation schedule, allowing
for the phased inclusion of specific categories of notices, publications,
or other information as the program progresses, provided that the state
controller shall ensure that the electronic publication program is capa-
ble of the receipt, storage, and publication of all notices, publications,


and other information authorized to be electronically published under this
section, with the exception of electronic publications by governmental en-
tities related to public works projects or the disposal of surplus property
owned by a governmental entity, no later than January 1, 2026, and that it is
fully operational for the receipt, storage, and publication of all notices,
publications, and other information authorized for electronic publication
under this section no later than January 1, 2027. The state controller
shall, by January 1, 2027, implement functionality on its website to allow
users to subscribe to receive electronic notifications of public meeting
notices of governmental entities, with the ability to filter such notices
by the location of the public meeting and the location of any project site
address required by law to be included in a public meeting notice.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Electronically publish" or "electronic publication" means the
posting of digital information on the state controller's website in the
manner provided in this section.
(b) "Governmental entity" has the same meaning provided in section
74-403, Idaho Code, and shall include all taxing districts in the state.
(6) This section does not relieve a governmental entity of the duty to
mail any notice required to be mailed by the laws of the state of Idaho.
SECTION 2. That Section 60-109A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
60-109A. PUBLICATION BY FIRST CLASS MAIL. Any notice required by law
to be published by any regional board, commission, department, or author-
ity created by or pursuant to statute; or by any county, city, school dis-
trict, special district, any joint district, or other political subdivision
of the state of Idaho may be published by mailing such notice by first class
mail, postage prepaid, to the residents of such jurisdiction; provided, how-
ever, that publication by mail as provided for herein, shall constitute le-
gal notice only if the cost of mailing, including preparation, materials and
postage, is less than the cost of other publication required by law. Notice
may be included with regularly occurring mailings such as utility billing.
Proof of such mailing shall be by sworn affidavit of the duly constituted of-
ficers of the body publishing the notice.
SECTION 3. That Section 60-106B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 1, Title 60, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 60-106B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
60-106B. ELECTRONIC PUBLICATION. (1) Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, any person, governmental entity, or business or other
entity required or permitted under the laws of the state of Idaho to pub-
lish notices, publications, or other information in a newspaper may instead
electronically publish such notices, publications, or other information
on the state controller's website. If all requirements of this section are
met, notices, publications, or other information electronically published


pursuant to this section shall have the same legal effect as notices, publi-
cations, or other information published in a newspaper pursuant to section
60-106, Idaho Code.
(2) The minimum publishing dates and duration requirements under the
laws of the state of Idaho for publishing notices, publications, or other in-
formation in a print newspaper shall apply equally to notices, publications,
or other information electronically published pursuant to this section.
(3) A governmental entity that electronically publishes any notice,
publication, or other information pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Comply with all advance notice requirements regarding the number of
days of advance notice required prior to government action; and
(b) Comply with the agenda requirements provided in section 74-204,
Idaho Code.
(4) The state controller shall facilitate the receipt, storage, and
publication of notices, publications, and other information that are pub-
lished pursuant to this section and ensure that the same are accessible
to the public free of charge. The state controller shall implement func-
tionality on its website to allow users to subscribe to receive electronic
notifications of public meeting notices of governmental entities, with the
ability to filter such notices by the location of the public meeting and the
location of any project site address required by law to be included in a pub-
lic meeting notice.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Electronically publish" or "electronic publication" means the
posting of digital information on the state controller's website in the
manner provided in this section.
(b) "Governmental entity" has the same meaning provided in section
74-403, Idaho Code, and shall include all taxing districts in the state.
(6) This section does not relieve a governmental entity of the duty to
mail any notice required to be mailed by the laws of the state of Idaho.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 3 and 4 of this act shall
be in full force and effect on and after January 1, 2027.